Tennessee, session 114, HB1279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-7-407, is amended by adding the
following as new subsections:
(c) Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, a privately owned property built
after 1899 that is located in whole or in part in a tourism development zone, as defined in
§ 7-88-103, is not subject to the authority of a historic zoning commission or a historic
zoning law, rule, review guideline, or regulation, with respect to any aspect of a project
that relates to or includes lighting; televisions; monitors; signs; speakers; electronic
devices, mechanisms, or equipment; weatherization such as seasonal canopies,
heaters, or tents; or any other aspect of a building, structure, or other improvement to
real property that, at the time the project commences, was not historic in nature.
(d) A property owner whose project falls within the exception set forth in
subsection (c) is not required to make an application to a historic zoning commission.
(e) A historic zoning commission does not have authority to stop or prevent the
continuation of such project if, upon notice from the historic zoning commission that a
project does not meet the exception set forth in subsection (c), a property owner files a
good faith affidavit with the commission along with the opinion of a licensed architect that
the project falls within the exception. Upon the receipt of a good faith affidavit and
opinion from a licensed architect, the historic zoning commission has no authority over
the project and in any subsequent hearing or proceeding whether administrative, in a
HB1279
002214
- 1 -

court of record, or otherwise, the opinion of the architect must be afforded a presumption
of correctness that may only be overcome by a finding of clear and convincing evidence
that the project is not subject to the exception found in subsection (c).
(f) If any aspect of a project involves any life or safety issues with respect to
doors, windows, ingress, or egress over which the local fire marshal or a similar
government official has authority pursuant to any law, regulation, or rule, the fire marshal
or government official may override a decision by a historic zoning commission related to
such project.
(g) As used in this section, "project" means any construction, alteration, repair,
improvement, rehabilitation, relocation, or demolition of any building, structure, or other
improvement to real property, or any aspect thereof.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002214